Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.570

Off-street parking space and facilities—Acquisition and disposition of real property.

Such towns are authorized to obtain by lease, purchase, donation and/or gift, or by eminent domain in the manner provided by law for the exercise of this power by cities, such real property for off-street parking as the legislative bodies thereof determine to be necessary by ordinance. Such property may be sold, transferred, exchanged, leased, or otherwise disposed of by the town when its legislative body has determined by ordinance such property is no longer necessary for off-street parking purposes.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.570. Prior: 1961 c 33 s 3.]

NOTES:

Eminent domain: Chapter 8.12 RCW.